Utah statutes.
70A-4a-301.   "Execution" and "execution date."
(1)  A payment order is "executed" by the receiving bank when it issues a
payment order intended to carry out the payment order received by the bank.  A
payment order received by the beneficiary's bank can be accepted but cannot be
executed.
(2)  "Execution date" of a payment order means the day on which the receiving
bank may properly issue a payment order in execution of the sender's order.
The execution date can be determined by instruction of the sender but cannot
be earlier than the day the order is received and, unless otherwise
determined, is the day the order is received.  If the sender's instruction
states a payment date, the execution date is the payment date or an earlier
date on which execution is reasonably necessary to allow payment to the
beneficiary on the payment date.
